Hawaii statutes.
§576B-712 Personal information; limit on
use. Personal information gathered or transmitted under this article may
be used only for the purposes for which it was gathered or transmitted. [L
2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next